Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB71.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 6 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) (a) Members of the General Assembly and members-elect of the General
Assembly who have received their certificates of election may prefile bills
and resolutions for introduction in the next succeeding regular legislative
session with the director of the Legislative Research Commission.
(b) Bills and resolutions that are prefiled pursuant to this section shall be in the
final and correct form for introduction in the General Assembly as required
by the Constitution of Kentucky, laws, and rules of the respective houses of
the Legislature.
(c) The original copy of every bill and resolution prefiled shall include the full
signature of the sponsor of the bill or resolution immediately below the
typed or printed name of the sponsor.
(2) The director of the Legislative Research Commission shall:
(a) Receive prefiled bills and resolutions;
(b) Assign numbers for introduction in the proper house in order of receipt;
(c) Publish the prefiled bill or resolution on the Commission's website once it
has been assigned a number; and
(d) Subject to the provisions of subsection (4) of this section, deliver the
original and all requisite copies of each bill and resolution to the clerk of
the Senate or the clerk of the House of Representatives, as appropriate, on
the first day of the regular session.
(3) Prefiled bills and resolutions shall be considered as introduced on the day of their
delivery to each house.
(4) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (2) of this section, in the event a
Page 1 of 2
XXXX 9/30/2025 9:16 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 954
person sponsoring a prefiled bill or resolution ceases to be a member of the
General Assembly at the time of the convening of the next succeeding regular
legislative session, the prefiling of that bill or resolution shall be considered to be
without effect, and the director of the Legislative Research Commission shall not
deliver the original or copies to the clerk of the Senate or the clerk of the House
of Representatives.
(5) A limit shall not be placed upon the number of bills that a member of the General
Assembly may prefile.
Page 2 of 2
XXXX 9/30/2025 9:16 AM Jacketed